North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-07 Rendering Plants [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-01.
License required to operate rendering plant. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 36-0701; S.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 39; 1989, ch. 425, § 12; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 347, § 26; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-02.
Inspection of establishment of applicant by state veterinarian. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 36-0702; S.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 40; 1989, ch. 425, § 13; 1995, ch. 347, § 27; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-03.
Granting of license — Fee — Term. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 36-0703; S.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 41; 1989, ch. 425, § 14; 1995, ch. 347, § 28; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-04.
Sanitary requirements of rendering establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 304, § 1.

36-07-05.
Disposal of waste and sewage from rendering plants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 304, § 1.

36-07-06.
Situation and conduct of rendering plants not to interfere with comfort or property of citizens. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 304, § 1.

36-07-07.
Unloading chutes and vehicles used by rendering plant — Regulations governing. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 36-0707; S.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 42; 1999, ch. 317, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-08.
Removal of carcasses from vehicle — Prohibition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 36-0708; S.L. 1989, ch. 425, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-09.
Operator of vehicle for plant to have certificate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 36-0709; S.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 43; 1989, ch. 425, § 16; 1995, ch. 347, § 29; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-10.
Inspection of plant authorized. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 36-0710; S.L. 1989, ch. 80, § 44; 1989, ch. 425, § 17; 1995, ch. 347, § 30; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-11.
Rendering done by packing plants operating under federal inspection — Exception. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 36-0711; S.L. 1961, ch. 242, § 1; 1989, ch. 80, § 45; 1989, ch. 425, § 18; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-12.
Money collected — Where credited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 36-0712; S.L. 1945, ch. 231, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 36-0712; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-13.
Restrictions on rebuilding and locating rendering plants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 36-0713; S.L. 1963, ch. 258, § 1; 1989, ch. 425, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.

36-07-14.
Penalty for violation of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 19, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 36-0714; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 379; repealed by 2017, ch. 68, § 18, effective July 1, 2017.